Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-227.01
Supreme Court Automation
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Supreme Court Automation
Cash Fund is created. The State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall only be used
to support automation expenses of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, district
courts, separate juvenile courts, county courts, and Nebraska Probation System
from the computer automation budget program.

On July 1, 2014, or as soon thereafter
as administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer six hundred
thousand dollars from the Supreme Court Automation Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Retirement Fund for Judges as an offset to the increase in the state's contribution
to the Nebraska Judges Retirement System.

Any money
in the Supreme Court Automation Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 17;

Laws 2014, LB906, § 14.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.